Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska30-2718
Types of account; existing accounts.

(a) An account may be for a single party or multiple parties. A multiple-party account may be with or without a right of survivorship between the parties. Subject to subsection (c) of section 30-2723, either a single-party account or a multiple-party account may have a POD designation, an agency designation, or both.

(b) An account established before, on, or after September 9, 1993, whether in the form prescribed in section 30-2719 or in any other form, is either a single-party account or a multiple-party account, with or without right of survivorship, and with or without a POD designation or an agency designation, within the meaning of sections 30-2716 to 30-2733, and is governed by such sections.

Laws 1993, LB 250, § 4.